California statutes. Financial Code
Except in the case of an exempt person, whenever the commissioner deems it to be necessary for the public interest, the commissioner has continuous authority to exercise the powers set forth in this division. These powers may be exercised whether or not an application for a license has been filed with the commissioner, any license has been issued, or if issued, has been surrendered, suspended, or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50329.

(a) In making an investigation or examination authorized by this division, the commissioner may, for a reasonable time not exceeding 30 days, control access to any documents and records of the licensee pertaining to the business of any residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer. The commissioner may place a keeper in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the place where they are usually kept. During the period of
 control, no director, officer, partner, or employee shall remove or attempt to remove any of the documents except pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the commissioner. However, the directors, officers, partners, and employees of the residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer may examine the documents or records. The licensee’s employees shall be permitted to make entries in the documents or records to reflect current transactions. Unless the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or records of the licensee have been, or are at risk of being altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a violation of this division, the licensee shall have access to the documents or records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business affairs.

(b) For the purpose of any investigation, examination, or proceeding under this division, the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner may
 administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any documents or records that the commissioner deems relevant.

(c) In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued to a director, officer, partner, or employee of a licensee, the superior court may issue an order requiring that person to appear before the commissioner. When before the commissioner, the director, officer, partner, or employee shall produce documentary evidence or give evidence on the matter under investigation. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt.

(d) No person is excused from testifying or from producing any document or record before the commissioner, on the ground that the testimony or evidence required by the commissioner may tend to incriminate the person or subject him or her to a penalty or
 forfeiture. However, no individual may be penalized for any matter concerning which he or she is compelled to testify or produce evidence, after validly claiming the privilege against self-incrimination. However, individual testimony is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury or contempt committed in testifying.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50330.

The authority to make or conduct any examination or investigation may be delegated by the commissioner to any deputy, investigator, examiner, or auditor appointed for that purpose. An individual appointed by the commissioner for this purpose may administer oaths and subpoena witnesses, and take their testimony. The appointment shall be made by an instrument in writing signed by the commissioner. Upon any examination or investigation, the instrument shall be produced by
 the appointed individual at any time upon demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50331.

All hearings provided for in this division shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The commissioner has all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50332.

Every order, decision, license, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to review, in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50333.

(a) The commissioner shall apply the guidance on nontraditional mortgage product risks published on November 14, 2006, by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators, and the Statement on Subprime Mortgage Lending published on July 17, 2007, by the aforementioned entities and the National Association of Consumer Credit Administrators, to
 licensees.

(b) The commissioner may adopt emergency and final rules to clarify the application of this section as soon as possible.

(c) A licensee shall adopt and adhere to policies and procedures that are reasonably intended to achieve the objectives set forth in the documents described in subdivision (a). A licensed mortgage loan originator shall adhere to policies and procedures developed by his or her employer in accordance with this division and applicable federal law and regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 77.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Assessments [50400. - 50402.]

50400.

The commissioner has the authority to levy assessments for the support of this part as provided for in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50401.

(a) In addition to other fees and reimbursements required to be paid under this division, each residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee shall pay to the commissioner an amount equal to the lesser of: (1) its pro rata share of all costs and expenses (including overhead and the maintenance of a prudent reserve not to exceed 90 days’ costs and expenses) that the commissioner reasonably expects to incur in the current fiscal year in the administration of this division and not otherwise recovered by the commissioner under this division or from the Financial Protection Fund, plus a deficit or less a surplus actually incurred during the prior two fiscal years; or (2) fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). The pro rata share shall be the greater of either three thousand dollars ($3,000) or the sum of: (A) a number derived from the ratio of the aggregate principal amount of the mortgage loans secured by residential real property originated by the licensee to all mortgage loans secured by residential real property originated by all licensees under this division, as shown by the annual financial reports to the commissioner, which number is then multiplied by one-half of the costs and expenses estimated by the commissioner; plus (B) a number derived from the ratio of the average value of mortgage loans secured by residential real property serviced by a licensee to the average value of all mortgage loans secured by residential real property serviced by all licensees under this division, as shown by the annual financial reports to the commissioner, which number is then multiplied by one-half of the costs and expenses estimated by the commissioner. For the purposes of this section, the “principal amount” of a mortgage loan means the initial total amount a borrower is obligated to repay the lender and the “average value” of loans serviced means the sum of the aggregate dollar value of all mortgage loans secured by residential real property serviced by a licensee, calculated as of the last day of each month in the calendar year just ended, divided by 12.

In order for the commissioner to calculate the assessment under this section, each licensee shall file an annual report for the calendar year just ended containing the information required by the commissioner on or before March 1 of the year in which the assessment is to be calculated.

In determining the
 amount assessed, the commissioner shall consider all appropriations from the Financial Protection Fund for the support of this division and all reimbursements provided for under this division.

(b) In no case shall the reimbursement, payment, or other fee authorized by this section exceed the cost, including overhead, reasonably incurred in the administration of this division, and the maintenance of a prudent reserve not to exceed 90 days’ costs and expenses.

(c) On or before the 30th day of September in each year, the commissioner shall notify each licensee by mail of the amount assessed and levied against it and that amount shall be paid within 20 days. If payment is not made within 20 days, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the assessment of
 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.

(d) If a licensee fails to pay the assessment on or before the 30th day following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the license issued to the licensee. An order issued under this section is not stayed by the filing of a request for a hearing. If, after an order is made, the request for hearing is filed in writing within 15 days from the date of service of the order and a hearing is not held within 60 days of the filing, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During a period when its license is revoked or suspended, a licensee shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by further order of the commissioner. However, the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in
 this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 16.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

50402.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 50401, if the commissioner determines that the charges and assessments set forth in this division for any year are in excess of the amount necessary, or are insufficient, to meet the expenses of administration of this division for that year, the assessments and charges for the following year shall be adjusted on a pro rata basis in accordance with the percentage of the excess or insufficiency as related to the actual charges
 and assessments for the year for which the excess or insufficiency occurred, in order to recover the actual costs of administration and provide a prudent reserve of 90 days’ costs and expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Prohibited Practices and Penalties [50500. - 50513.]

50500.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this division, or any rule or order under this division, shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or to both that fine and imprisonment. No person may be imprisoned for the
 violation of any rule or order unless he or she had knowledge of the rule or order. Conviction under this section shall not preclude the commissioner from exercising the authority provided in Section 50320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 115.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

50501.

(a) Any person who violates a provision of this division, or any rule or order under this division, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation. This penalty shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the commissioner in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) As applied to the penalties for acts in violation of this division, the remedies provided by this section and by other sections of this division are not exclusive, and may be sought and employed in any combination to enforce the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50501.5.

(a) If, upon inspection, examination, or investigation, the commissioner has cause to believe that a licensee or person is violating or has violated any provision of this division or any rule or order thereunder, the commissioner or his or her designee may issue a citation to that licensee or person in writing, describing with particularity the basis of the citation. Each citation may contain an order to correct the violation or violations identified and provide a reasonable time period or periods by which the violation or violations must be corrected. In addition, each citation may assess an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) that shall be deposited in the State Corporations Fund. In assessing a fine, the commissioner shall
 give due consideration to the appropriateness of the amount of the fine with respect to factors including the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the person or licensees cited, and the history of previous violations. A citation issued and a fine assessed pursuant to this section, while constituting punishment for a violation of law, shall be in lieu of other administrative discipline by the commissioner for the offense or offenses cited, and the citation and fine payment thereof by a licensee shall not be reported as disciplinary action taken by the commissioner.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this section shall prevent the commissioner from issuing an order to desist and refrain from engaging in a specific business or activity or activities, or an order to suspend all business operations to a person or licensee who is engaged in or who has engaged in continued or repeated violations of this division. In any of these
 circumstances, the sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other administrative, civil, or criminal remedies.

(c) If, within 30 days from the receipt of the citation, the person cited fails to notify the department that the person intends to request a hearing as described in subdivision (d), the citation shall be deemed final.

(d) Any hearing under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided for in this section, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the administrative fine and an order compelling the cited person to comply with the order of the
 commissioner. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final order of the commissioner, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 243, Sec. 5.   (AB 1091)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

50502.

It is a violation of this division for any person to make any untrue statement of a material fact in any document filed with the commissioner under this division or rules adopted thereunder, or to omit any material fact which is required to be stated in any document.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50503.

(a) It is a violation for any person subject to this law or any director, partner, shareholder controlling an ownership interest of 10 percent or more, trustee, officer, agent, or employee of any such person to do any of the following:

(1) Knowingly or recklessly disburse or cause the disbursal of trust funds, except as permitted by Section 50202, or knowingly or recklessly to
 direct, participate in, or aid or abet in a material way, any activity that constitutes theft or fraud in connection with any trust fund transaction.

(2) Knowingly or recklessly make or cause to be made any misstatement or omission of a material fact, pertaining to a loan or loan servicing.

(b) Any director, officer, partner, shareholder controlling an ownership interest of 10 percent or more, trustee, or employee of a residential mortgage loan servicer who abstracts or misappropriates money, funds, trust obligations, or property deposited with a licensee, commits a violation of this section. If a violation results in a criminal conviction, the court shall, in addition to any other punishment imposed, order the person to make full restitution. Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to repeal, amend, or impair any existing provision of law prescribing a punishment for
 such an offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50504.

(a) If an amount other than or in excess of the charges permitted by this division is willfully charged, contracted for, or received, in addition to any other penalties or remedies, the commissioner may order the licensee to refund to all borrowers charged the excess amount, the excess amount and the amount of the charge, both with interest at the rate of 10 percent per annum, calculated from the date the improper charge was imposed.

(b) If interest on the principal amount of a loan in excess of the amount authorized by this division is willfully charged, contracted for, or received, in addition to any other penalties or remedies, the commissioner may order the licensee to refund the excess interest amount to all borrowers charged the excess amount, with interest at the rate of 10 percent per annum, calculated from the date the improper charge was imposed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 564, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

50505.

Any person who violates any provision of any of the following federal acts or regulations violates this division:

(a) The federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.).

(b) The federal Truth in Lending Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).

(c) The federal Home Ownership Equity Protection Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1639).

(d) Any regulation promulgated under any of the federal acts in subdivision (a), (b), or (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 7.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

50506.

Any director, officer, partner, trustee, or employee of a licensee, its holding company, or its affiliates who knowingly receives or appropriates any of the licensee’s property, other than in payment of a just demand or with intent to defraud, or who omits to make or causes an omission to be made in the full and true entry thereof in its books and accounts or concurs in omitting to make any material entry thereof, violates this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50507.

Any director, officer, partner, trustee, or employee of a licensee, its holding company, or its affiliates who knowingly makes or concurs in making or publishing any false entry in its books or records, any written report, exhibit, or statement of its affairs or pecuniary condition containing any material statement which is false, or having the custody of its books, willfully refuses or neglects to make any proper entry in the books as required by law or to allow the
 books to be inspected by the commissioner or his or her deputies or investigators, violates this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50508.

Any director, officer, partner, trustee, or employee of a licensee, its holding company, or its affiliates who makes a false entry in any book or record of the business, or in connection with any transaction of the business, with intent to deceive any officer, director, or employee thereof, or any agent or examiner, employed or lawfully appointed to examine into its condition or any of its affairs or transactions, or to any public officer who has authority to examine
 into its affairs or transactions, or who, with like intent, omits to make a new entry of any matter particularly pertaining to the business property condition, or transactions of the entity in any document of the licensee, or who, with like intent, makes unavailable any document of the licensee made, written, or kept, or required to be made, written, or kept by him or her under his or her direction, violates this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50509.

Any officer, director, partner, trustee, or employee of any entity who abstracts or misapplies any of the money, funds, or property of a licensee, or misapplies its credit, or abstracts or misapplies money, funds, trust obligations, or property deposited with a licensee, violates this division. If a violation results in a criminal conviction, the court shall, in addition to any other punishment imposed, order the person to make full restitution to the licensee. Nothing
 in this section shall be deemed or construed to repeal, amend, or impair any existing provision of law prescribing a punishment for such an offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50510.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize a criminal prosecution for a violation of a civil statute incorporated by reference into this division. Civil monetary penalties and fines shall not be imposed under this law for a violation of subdivision (e) or (j) of Section 50204 or Section 50505 if a licensee demonstrates that it has paid a civil monetary penalty or fine for the same act or transaction, as a violation of Section 17200 or 17500 of the Business
 and Professions Code, Section 2941 of the Civil Code, or provisions of the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act (12 U.S.C.A. Sec. 2601 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50511.

The commissioner may, subject to the requirements of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 50318, suspend for a period not to exceed 12 months or bar a person from any position of employment with a licensee if the commissioner finds that the person has willfully used or claimed without authority a designation or certification of special education, practice, or skill that the person has not attained, or willfully held out to the public a confusingly similar
 designation or certification for the purpose of misleading the public regarding his or her qualifications or experience.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 201, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

50512.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly alter, destroy, mutilate, conceal, cover up, falsify, or make a false entry in any record, document, or tangible object with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make an untrue statement to the commissioner during
 the course of licensing, investigation, or examination, with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

50513.

(a) The commissioner may do one or more of the following:

(1) Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to renew a mortgage loan originator license for a violation of this division, or any rules or regulations adopted thereunder.

(2) Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or
 decline to renew a mortgage loan originator license if an applicant or licensee fails at any time to meet the requirements of Section 50141 or 50144, or withholds information or makes a material misstatement in an application for a license or license renewal.

(3) Order restitution against a mortgage loan originator or any residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee employing a mortgage loan originator for a violation of this division.

(4) Impose fines on a mortgage loan originator or any residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee employing a mortgage loan originator pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d).

(5) Issue orders or directives to mortgage loan originators under this division as follows:

(A) Order or direct a mortgage loan
 originator or any residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee employing a mortgage loan originator to desist and refrain from conducting business, including immediate temporary orders to desist and refrain.

(B) Order or direct a mortgage loan originator or any residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee employing a mortgage loan originator to cease any harmful activities or violations of this division, including immediate temporary orders to desist and refrain.

(C) Enter immediate temporary orders to cease business under a license issued pursuant to the authority granted under Section 50002 if the commissioner determines that the license was erroneously granted or the mortgage loan originator is currently in violation of this division.

(D) Order or direct any other affirmative action as the commissioner
 deems necessary.

(b) The commissioner may impose a civil penalty on a mortgage loan originator or any residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee employing a mortgage loan originator, if the commissioner finds, on the record after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the mortgage loan originator or any residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee employing a mortgage loan originator has violated or failed to comply with any requirement of this division or any regulation prescribed by the commissioner under this division or order issued under authority of this division.

(c) The maximum amount of penalty for each act or omission described in subdivision (b) shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(d) Each violation or failure to comply with any directive or order of the commissioner is a separate
 and distinct violation or failure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 79.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Brokerage Services for Borrowers [50700. - 50706.]

50700.

(a) A residential mortgage lender, or a person or employee acting under the authority of a residential mortgage lender’s license, including a mortgage loan originator, shall not provide brokerage services to a borrower, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(b) “Brokerage services” means either of the following:

(1) Obtaining or attempting to obtain, on behalf of a borrower, a residential mortgage loan, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 50003, secured by residential real estate, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 50003, made with the funds of another institutional lender, as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), and (4) of subdivision (k) of Section 50003, and closed in the name of that lender, for a fee paid by the borrower or the institutional lender.

(2) Obtaining or attempting to obtain, on behalf of a borrower, a residential mortgage loan, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 50003, secured by residential real estate, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 50003, made with the funds of another institutional lender, as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), and (4) of subdivision (k) of Section 50003, but closed in the name of the licensee, for a fee paid by the borrower or the
 institutional lender.

(c) A residential mortgage lender or a mortgage loan originator employed by a residential mortgage lender may provide brokerage services under the authority of the lender’s license, if the lender first enters into a written brokerage agreement with the borrower that satisfies the requirements of Section 50701.

(d) This chapter does not authorize a residential mortgage lender licensee to do any of the following:

(1) Provide brokerage services through independent contractors.

(2) Provide brokerage services through an employee not licensed as a mortgage loan originator.

(3) Obtain or attempt to obtain for a borrower a residential mortgage loan that is a “high cost
 mortgage,” referred to in Section 152(aa)(1) of the federal Home Ownership and Equity Protection Act of 1994, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1602(aa)).

(4) Hold itself out to borrowers, through advertising, as a mortgage broker, rather than a residential mortgage lender. However, a licensee shall disclose its status as a broker or agent when that disclosure is required by law.

(5) Perform activity subject to Section 10131 of the Business and Professions Code, except activities authorized by this division.

(e) A mortgage loan originator may only provide brokerage services as an employee of a licensed residential mortgage lender.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 287, Sec. 14.   (SB 1137)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

50701.

(a) As soon as practical after a borrower requests that the residential mortgage lender licensee arrange a loan to be made by another institutional lender, and before the licensee performs brokerage services for the borrower, the licensee and borrower shall enter into a written loan brokerage agreement that satisfies the requirements of this section.

(b) Both the licensee’s authorized representative, who shall be a licensed mortgage loan originator, and the borrower shall sign and date the loan brokerage agreement, and the licensee shall deliver a copy of the fully executed loan brokerage agreement to the borrower either upon execution, if the documents are signed in the licensee’s office, or within three business days after execution.

(c) The loan brokerage agreement shall include the mortgage loan originator’s unique identifier.

(d) The loan brokerage agreement shall contain an explicit statement that (1) the licensee is acting as the agent of the borrower in providing brokerage services to the borrower, and (2) when acting as agent for the borrower, it owes to that borrower a fiduciary duty of utmost care, honesty, and loyalty in the transaction, including the duty of full disclosure of all material facts. If
 the licensee is authorized to act as an agent for any other person, the brokerage agreement shall contain a statement of that fact and identification of that person.

(e) The loan brokerage agreement shall contain a detailed description of the services the licensee agrees to perform for the borrower, and a good faith estimate of any fees the licensee will receive for those services, whether paid by the borrower, the institutional lender, or both.

(f) The loan brokerage agreement shall carry a clear and conspicuous statement of the conditions under which the borrower is obligated to pay the licensee for brokerage services rendered under the agreement.

(g) The loan brokerage agreement shall provide that, if the licensee makes a materially false or misleading statement or omission in the inducement or implementation of
 the agreement, the borrower may, in addition to any other legal rights or remedies, upon written notice, do any of the following:

(1) Rescind the brokerage agreement.

(2) Recover fees paid by the borrower to the licensee for brokerage services rendered by the licensee pursuant to the agreement.

(3) Recover actual costs, including attorney’s fees, for enforcing the borrower’s rights under the loan brokerage agreement.

(h) If the loan brokerage agreement fails to set forth the rights in subdivision (g), these rights shall be implied by operation of law.

(i) The loan brokerage agreement shall be the only agreement between the borrower and the licensee with respect to a single loan.

(j) A licensee whose services to a borrower are limited to providing brokerage services may not require a borrower to pay fees or charges before the residential mortgage loan closing, other than either of the following:

(1) Actual charges to be incurred by the licensee on behalf of the borrower for services from third parties necessary to process the application, such as credit reports, appraisals, inspections, flood certification, and tax service, and, in transactions where those services are provided by the licensee, a charge not to exceed the fee customarily charged for the same or comparable service in the community in which the service was rendered.

(2) An application fee.

A licensee may not accept a fee under Section 50203(a)(1) or (2) and subsequently require a borrower
 to pay additional fees or charges under this paragraph for the borrower’s loan transaction.

(k) Any loan brokerage agreement that provides for the collection of an application fee shall be approved as to form by the commissioner before its use by a licensee, if the agreement meets the following requirements:

(1) The agreement specifies the services to be rendered for the application fee.

(2) The agreement sets forth the amount of the application fee and the date the fee becomes due and payable.

(3) The agreement does not contain a provision that purports to except or relieve the licensee from the responsibility to fulfill verbal commitments and representations made by employees or agents of the licensee when contracting for the application fee, or
 guarantee that a loan will be obtained.

(4) The agreement sets forth a definite date for full performance of the services promised in exchange for the application fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 83.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50702.

(a) The annual report required by Section 50401(a) shall include both of the following:

(1) The number and the aggregate principal amount of closed residential mortgage loans secured by residential real estate in which the licensee provides brokerage services, as defined in this chapter.

(2) The number and aggregate principal amount of residential mortgage loans made by the licensee under this division.

(b) The sum total of the aggregate principal loan amounts reported in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed
 the aggregate principal amount of mortgage loans secured by residential real property originated by the licensee, for purposes of determining a licensee’s annual assessment under subdivision (a) of Section 50401.

(c) The commissioner shall provide copies of the annual reports required by subdivision (a) of Section 50401 to the Bureau of Real Estate upon request of the Real Estate Commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 93.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

50703.

Notwithstanding Section 10248.3 of the Business and Professions Code, the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 10240) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code shall apply to a residential mortgage loan arranged by a licensee pursuant to this chapter, unless that loan exceeds the principal loan amount specified for a bona fide loan secured directly or collaterally by a first trust deed or a bona fide loan secured directly or
 collaterally by a lien junior thereto, specified in Section 10245 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective March 20, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

50706.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the commissioner has primary regulatory jurisdiction over all transactions in which a licensed residential mortgage lender provides brokerage services, whether the brokerage services are provided under the authority of this chapter or under the Real Estate Law.

(b) If the commissioner has reason to believe that a residential mortgage lender
 or one of its employees has violated the Real Estate Law while providing brokerage services under a real estate broker’s license, the commissioner shall refer the matter to the Real Estate Commissioner, who may conduct an investigation to determine if a violation of the Real Estate Law has occurred. If the Real Estate Commissioner believes a violation has occurred, the Real Estate Commissioner may commence an enforcement action under the Real Estate Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective March 20, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20.5. EXCHANGE FACILITATORS [51000. - 51013.]

51000.

As used in this division, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Client” means the taxpayer with whom the exchange facilitator enters into an agreement described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(b) (1) “Exchange facilitator” means a person that does any of the following:

(A) Facilitates, for a fee, as defined in subdivision (c), an exchange of like-kind property by entering into an agreement with a taxpayer by which the exchange facilitator acquires from the taxpayer the contractual rights to sell the taxpayer’s relinquished property located in this state and transfers a replacement property to the taxpayer as a qualified intermediary as that term is defined under Treasury Regulation Section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(4), or enters into an agreement with the taxpayer to take title to a property in this state as an exchange accommodation titleholder (EAT) as that term is defined in Internal Revenue Service Revenue Procedure 2000–37, or enters into an agreement with a taxpayer to act as a qualified trustee or qualified escrow holder as those terms are defined under Treasury Regulation Section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3), except as provided in paragraph (2).
